Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 101
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Editor's note:

Provisions relating to corporations were contained in articles 1 to 10 of this title prior to July 1, 1994. A comparative table showing the relocation of subject matter from articles 1 through 10 to articles 101 through 117 as a result of the recodification of the Colorado Corporation Code in 1993, effective July 1, 1994, is found in the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

Section

PART 1 SHORT TITLE AND
RESERVATION OF POWER

PART 2 FILING DOCUMENTS

PART 3 SECRETARY OF STATE

PART 4 DEFINITIONS

PART 5 PUBLIC BENEFIT CORPORATIONS